Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4495.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16o. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.271 Property E Fraudulently issuing or selling domestic securities 10 750.272 Property G Sale of fraudulent stock of foreign corporations 10 750.273 Property E Obtaining signature with intent to defraud 10 750.274 Property E Purchasing or collecting on fraudulent financial document 10 750.276 Property G Obtaining signature or promise of vendee of grain to sell at fictitious price 4 750.277 Pub trst G Sale or transfer of note of vendee of grain to sell at a fictitious price 4 750.278 Property G Issuing or delivering fraudulent warehouse receipt 5 750.279 Property G Fraudulent disposal of entrusted property 4 750.280 Property E Gross fraud or cheat at common law 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.282 Pub ord G Fraudulently damaging or using property of utility in amount over $500 4 750.282a Property E Illegally selling or transferring product or service of electric service provider or natural gas provider to another person 5 750.300 Pub ord G Killing or injuring animal to defraud insurance company 2 750.300a(1)(a) Property G Food stamp fraud of $250 or less ? second offense 5 Property G Food stamp fraud of $250 or less ? third or subsequent offense 10 750.300a(1)(b) Property E Food stamp fraud of more than $250 to $1,000 5 Property E Food stamp fraud of more than $250 to $1,000 ? subsequent offense 10 750.300a(1)(c) Property E Food stamp fraud of more than $1,000 10 750.303 Pub ord H Gaming 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 750.313 Pub ord H Gambling in stocks, bonds, or commodities 2 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00615'25) or House Bill No. 4494 (request no. H00615'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.